Utah statutes.
67-5a-6.   Council director -- Qualifications and compensation.
(1)  The council shall appoint a director.  The director is the chief
administrative officer and serves at the pleasure of the council.
(2)  The director shall:
(a)  be an attorney admitted to practice in the courts of the state;
(b)  be selected on the basis of professional ability and experience in the
fields of administration, prosecution, and criminal law; and
(c)  possess an understanding of court procedures, evidence, and criminal law.
(3)  The council shall select and establish the compensation of the director
and staff, consistent with state personnel policies.
